Vermont, session 2025-2026, H28.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Title 1 * * *
Sec. 1. 1 V.S.A. § 127 is amended to read:
§ 127. OATH; SWORN
“Oath” shall include affirmation where by law an affirmation may be
substituted. In like in all cases, and “sworn” shall include affirmed.
Sec. 2. 1 V.S.A. § 137 is amended to read:
§ 137. SWORN OR AFFIRMED

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 2 of 69
“Sworn” or “affirmed” when applied to public officers required by the
constitution Constitution to take certain oaths or affirmations shall refer to
those oaths or affirmations; when applied to other officers, it shall mean sworn
or affirmed to the faithful discharge of the duties of their offices before a
person authorized to administer oaths and affirmations.
* * * Title 2 * * *
Sec. 3. 2 V.S.A. § 3 is amended to read:
§ 3. SENATE CERTIFICATES; OATHS AND AFFIRMATIONS;
SECRETARY; CANVASSING COMMITTEE
The members-elect of the Senate shall deliver their certificates of election
to the President of the Senate before 10 o’clock in the forenoon of the first
Wednesday next after the first Monday of January, following their election; at
which time, the Senate shall be called to order by its President and the names
of the Senators who have presented their certificates shall be called. When a
quorum appears, the members shall take and subscribe the oath or affirmation
of allegiance and the oath or affirmation prescribed for Representatives to the
General Assembly and shall then elect a Secretary, who shall appoint an
Assistant Secretary, for whose acts he or she the Secretary shall be responsible.
The Senate shall then appoint a committee, consisting of one Senator from
each district, to join such committee as the House of Representatives appoints,

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 3 of 69
to canvass the votes for Governor, Lieutenant Governor, State Treasurer,
Secretary of State, Auditor of Accounts, and Attorney General.
Sec. 4. 2 V.S.A. § 70(b) is amended to read:
(b) Powers; training.
(1) A Capitol Police officer shall have all the same powers and authority
as sheriffs and other law enforcement officers anywhere in the State, which
shall include the authority to arrest persons and enforce the civil and criminal
laws, keep the peace, provide security, and serve civil and criminal process.
For this purpose, a Capitol Police officer shall subscribe to the same oaths and
affirmations as are required for sheriffs.
* * *
Sec. 5. 2 V.S.A. § 267a is amended to read:
§ 267a. INVESTIGATIONS
The Attorney General shall investigate, on his or her the Attorney General’s
own initiative or in response to a complaint filed in writing with the Attorney
General, whether a violation of this chapter has occurred. The Attorney
General may administer oaths and affirmations, require filing of a statement
under oath or affirmation, take evidence, and require the production, by
subpoena or otherwise, of financial records, books, papers, correspondence,
and other documents and records the Attorney General considers to be relevant
and material to the investigation. The Attorney General shall make a

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 4 of 69
determination of each complaint filed and, at the time of resolution of a
complaint which that is found to have merit, shall post on the website of the
Office of the Attorney General a brief summary of the complaint and
resolution.
* * * Title 3 * * *
Sec. 6. 3 V.S.A. § 123(h) is amended to read:
(h) Notwithstanding any provision of Title 26 of the Vermont Statutes
Annotated to the contrary, the Office, on behalf of the Director or a board, may
use electronic mail to send notices and reminders that would otherwise be sent
by mail, except certified mail, and may use online services to elicit
information and sworn or affirmed attestations that would otherwise be
obtained on a paper form.
Sec. 7. 3 V.S.A. § 129 is amended to read:
§ 129. POWERS OF BOARDS OR OF DIRECTOR IN ADVISOR
PROFESSIONS; DISCIPLINE PROCESS
(a) In addition to any other provisions of law, a board or the Director, in
the case of professions that have advisor appointees, may exercise the
following powers:
* * *
(2) Issue subpoenas and administer oaths and affirmations in connection
with any authorized hearing, investigation, or disciplinary proceeding.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 5 of 69
Subpoenas may be issued exparte by the chair of the board, the Director, or
any attorney representing a party. Depositions may be taken after charges
upon due notice to all parties without specific authorization by the board.
* * *
(f)(1)(A) The Director may appoint a hearing officer, who shall be an
attorney admitted to practice in this State, to conduct a hearing that would
otherwise be heard by a board. A hearing officer appointed under this
subsection (f) may administer oaths and affirmations and exercise the powers
of the board properly incidental to the conduct of the hearing.
* * *
Sec. 8. 3 V.S.A. § 151 is amended to read:
§ 151. ELECTION AND TERM
An Attorney General shall be elected at the same time and in the same
manner as provided for the election of other State officers. He or she An
individual elected Attorney General shall be sworn to or shall affirm the
faithful discharge of his or her the duties of the office of Attorney General.
His or her The term of office of an individual elected Attorney General shall
commence when his or her the individual’s election is declared by the
committee appointed by the Senate and House of Representatives to canvass
the votes, agreeably with 17 V.S.A. § 2592, or when elected by the General
Assembly pursuant to said section, and continue for a term of two years.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 6 of 69
Sec. 9. 3 V.S.A. § 153(b) is amended to read:
(b) The Attorney General may appoint a Deputy Attorney General with the
approval of the Governor, remove him or her the Deputy Attorney General at
pleasure, and be responsible for his or her the Deputy Attorney General’s acts.
Such deputy The Deputy Attorney General shall perform such duties as the
Attorney General shall direct, and in the absence or disability of the Attorney
General perform the duties of the Attorney General. In case a vacancy occurs
in the Office office of Attorney General, such deputy the Deputy Attorney
General shall assume and discharge the duties of such the office until such the
vacancy is filled. Such The appointment of the Deputy Attorney General shall
be in writing and be recorded in the Office of the Secretary of State. Such The
Deputy Attorney General shall take the oath or affirmation required by the
constitution Constitution, shall be an informing officer, and shall have the
same authority throughout the State in civil or criminal matters as State’s
Attorneys have in their respective counties.
Sec. 10. 3 V.S.A. § 156 is amended to read:
§ 156. DUTIES
Such A legal assistant appointed pursuant to section 155 of this chapter
shall perform such duties as the Attorney General directs and may appear in
the trial or hearing of any civil or criminal cause in any court of the State on
behalf of the Attorney General. Before assuming his or her any duties, such

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 7 of 69
the legal assistant shall take and subscribe to the oath or affirmation prescribed
by the Constitution.
Sec. 11. 3 V.S.A. § 258 is amended to read:
§ 258. REMOVALOF CIVILOFFICERS
The Governor may remove any civil officer whose appointment devolves
upon the Governor in the first instance, whether appointed by him or her the
current Governor or by any of his or her the Governor’s predecessors, with or
without the advice and consent of the Senate, and appoint a suitable person to
succeed such official, subject to removal in his or her the Governor’s
discretion, who shall be sworn or make an affirmation and who shall give the
bond, if any, required by law. Such A person so appointed, unless sooner
removed, shall perform the duties and be entitled to the pay of the person
whom he or she the appointed official succeeds, until March 1 of the next
biennial year and until his or her a successor is appointed and has qualified.
Sec. 12. 3 V.S.A. § 317 is amended to read:
§ 317. OATHS, AFFIRMATIONS, TESTIMONY, AND THE
PRODUCTION OF RECORDS
The Commissioner shall have the power to administer oaths and
affirmations, subpoena witnesses, and order the production of books and
papers pertinent to any investigation or hearing authorized by this chapter.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 8 of 69
Sec. 13. 3 V.S.A. § 925(d) is amended to read:
(d) The fact finder shall conduct hearings, pursuant to rules established by
the Board. Upon request of either party or of the fact finder, the Board may
issue subpoenas of persons and documents for the hearings and the fact finder
may require that testimony be given under oath or affirmation and may
administer oaths and affirmations.
Sec. 14. 3 V.S.A. § 965(c) is amended to read:
(c) The Board shall have power to administer oaths and affirmations and
take testimony under oath or affirmation relative to the matter of inquiry. At
any hearing ordered by the Board, the Board shall have the power to subpoena
witnesses and to demand the production of books, papers, records, and
documents for its examination. Officers who serve subpoenas issued by the
Board and witnesses attending hearings conducted by the Board shall receive
fees and compensation at the same rates as officers and witnesses in causes
before a Criminal Division of the Superior Court, to be paid on vouchers of the
Board.
Sec. 15. 3 V.S.A. § 1018(d) is amended to read:
(d) The fact finder shall conduct hearings pursuant to rules of the Board.
Upon request of either party or of the fact finder, the Board may issue
subpoenas of persons and documents for the hearings, and the fact finder may

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 9 of 69
require that testimony be given under oath or affirmation and may administer
oaths and affirmations.
Sec. 16. 3 V.S.A. § 1030(c) is amended to read:
(c) The Board may administer oaths and affirmations, take testimony,
subpoena witnesses, and demand production of documents. Officers who
serve subpoenas issued by the Board and witnesses attending hearings shall be
paid fees and compensation on vouchers of the Board at the same rates as
officers and witnesses in causes before a Criminal Division of the Superior
Court.
Sec. 17. 3 V.S.A. § 1230(d) is amended to read:
(d) Subpoenas and, oaths, and affirmations. The Commission, the
Executive Director, and the Commission’s legal counsel and investigators shall
have the power to issue subpoenas and administer oaths and affirmations in
connection with any investigation or hearing, including compelling the
provision of materials or the attendance of witnesses at any investigation or
hearing. The Commission, the Executive Director, and the Commissioner’s
legal counsel shall seek voluntary compliance prior to issuing a subpoena,
except in cases where there is reasonable suspicion that materials will not be
produced in a timely manner. The Commission, the Executive Director, and
the Commission’s legal counsel and investigators may take or cause
depositions to be taken as needed in any investigation or hearing.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 10 of 69
Sec. 18. 3 V.S.A. § 2103 is amended to read:
§ 2103. OATH, OATHS AND AFFIRMATIONS; MEETINGS;
COMMITTEES
(a) Each Secretary shall take and file the official oath or affirmation prior
to assuming office.
* * *
Sec. 19. 3 V.S.A. § 3091(b) is amended to read:
(b) The hearing shall be conducted by the Board or by a hearing officer
appointed by the Board. The Chair of the Board may compel, by subpoena,
the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of books and
records. All witnesses shall be examined under oath or affirmation. The
Board shall adopt rules with reference to appeals, which shall not be
inconsistent with this chapter. The rules shall provide for reasonable notice to
parties, and an opportunity to be heard and be represented by counsel.
* * * Title 4 * * *
Sec. 20. 4 V.S.A. § 4 is amended to read:
§ 4. JUSTICES
* * *
(c) A Supreme Court Justice may file in the Office of the Secretary of
State, on or before September 1 of the year preceding the expiration of the
term for which the Justice was appointed or retained, a declaration that the

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 11 of 69
Justice will be a candidate for retention. However, a Justice appointed and
having taken the oath or affirmation of office after September 1 of the year
preceding the expiration of the term of office shall automatically be a
candidate for retention without filing notice. When a Justice files such a
declaration, the Justice’s name shall be submitted to the General Assembly for
a vote on retention. The General Assembly shall vote upon one ballot on the
question “Shall the following Supreme Court Justices be retained in office?”
The names of the Justices shall be followed by “Yes __ No __ .” If a majority
of those voting on the question vote against retention, upon expiration of the
term of office, a vacancy shall exist that shall be filled by appointment in
accordance with the Constitution and chapter 15 of this title; if the majority
vote is in favor of retention, the Justice shall, unless removed for cause, remain
in office for another term and, at its end, shall be eligible for retention in office
in the manner prescribed pursuant to this subsection.
(d) The Court Administrator shall notify the Secretary of State whenever a
Justice is appointed and takes the oath or affirmation of office after September
1 of the year preceding the expiration of the term of office to which the Justice
has succeeded, thereby resulting in automatic notification of an intention to
continue in office. Whenever a Justice files a declaration under subsection (c)
of this section, or notification occurs automatically, the Secretary of State shall

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 12 of 69
notify the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House, the Office of
Legislative Counsel, and the Office of Legislative Operations forthwith.
Sec. 21. 4 V.S.A. § 27b is amended to read:
§ 27b. SELF-ATTESTED DECLARATION IN LIEU OF NOTARIZATION
* * *
(c) This section shall not apply to an affidavit in support of a search
warrant application, an application for a nontestimonial identification order, an
oath or affirmation required by 14 V.S.A. § 108, or consents and
relinquishments in adoption proceedings governed by Title 15A.
Sec. 22. 4 V.S.A. § 71 is amended to read:
§ 71. APPOINTMENT AND TERM OF SUPERIOR JUDGES
* * *
(b) A Superior judge may file in the Office of the Secretary of State, on or
before September 1 of the year preceding the expiration of the term for which
the Superior judge was appointed or retained, a declaration that the Superior
judge will be a candidate for retention. However, a Superior judge appointed
and having taken the oath or affirmation of office after September 1 of the year
preceding the expiration of the term of office shall automatically be a
candidate for retention without filing notice. When a judge files such a
declaration, the judge’s name shall be submitted to the General Assembly for a
vote on retention. The General Assembly shall vote upon one ballot on the

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 13 of 69
question “Shall the following Superior judges be retained in office?” The
names of the judges shall be listed followed by “Yes __ No __ .” If a majority
of those voting on the question vote against retention, upon expiration of the
term of office, a vacancy shall exist that shall be filled by appointment in
accordance with the Constitution and chapter 15 of this title; if the majority
vote is in favor of retention, the judge shall, unless removed for cause, remain
in office for another term and, at its end, shall be eligible for retention in office
in the manner prescribed pursuant to this subsection.
(c) The Court Administrator shall notify the Secretary of State whenever a
Superior judge is appointed and takes the oath or affirmation of office after
September 1 of the year preceding the expiration of the term of office to which
the judge has succeeded, thereby resulting in automatic notification of an
intention to continue in office. Whenever a Superior judge files a declaration
under subsection (b) of this section or notification occurs automatically, the
Secretary of State shall notify the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the
House, the Office of Legislative Counsel, and the Office of Legislative
Operations forthwith.
* * *
Sec. 23. 4 V.S.A. § 362 is amended to read:
§ 362. OATHS AND AFFIRMATIONS
A Probate judge or register may administer oaths and affirmations.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 14 of 69
Sec. 24. 4 V.S.A. § 461 is amended to read:
§ 461. OFFICE OF MAGISTRATE; JURISDICTION; SELECTION; TERM
* * *
(c)(1) Terms of office of magistrates, except in the case of an appointment
to fill a vacancy or unexpired term, shall be for a term of sixyears from and
including April 1 in the year of the magistrate’s appointment or retention. A
magistrate shall remain in office until a successor is appointed and qualified,
unless sooner removed for cause or unless he or she the magistrate resigns.
(2) A magistrate may file in the office Office of the Secretary of State,
on or before September 1 of the year preceding the expiration of the term for
which the magistrate was appointed or retained, a declaration that the
magistrate will be a candidate to succeed themself for retention. However, a
magistrate appointed and having taken the oath or affirmation of office after
September 1 of the year preceding the expiration of the term of office shall
automatically be a candidate for retention without filing notice. When a
magistrate files such a declaration, the magistrate’s name shall be submitted to
the General Assembly for a vote on retention. The General Assembly shall
vote upon one ballot on the question: “Shall the following magistrates be
retained in office?” The names of the magistrates shall be listed followed by
“Yes____ No____.” If a majority of those voting on the question vote against
retaining a magistrate in office, upon the expiration of the term, a vacancy

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 15 of 69
shall exist that shall be filled in accordance with the Constitution and chapter
15 of this title. If the majority vote is in favor of retention, the magistrate
shall, unless removed for cause, remain in office for another term and, at its
end, shall be eligible for retention in office in the manner prescribed pursuant
to this subdivision.
(3) The Court Administrator shall notify the Secretary of State
whenever a magistrate is appointed and takes the oath or affirmation of office
after September 1 of the year preceding the expiration of the term of office to
which the magistrate has succeeded, thereby resulting in automatic notification
of an intention to continue in office. Whenever a magistrate files a declaration
under subdivision (2) of this subsection or when notification occurs
automatically, the Secretary of State shall notify the President of the Senate,
the Speaker of the House, the Office of Legislative Counsel, and the Office of
Legislative Operations forthwith.
* * *
Sec. 25. 4 V.S.A. § 466(d) is amended to read:
(d) Witnesses shall be sworn or shall make an affirmation. Hearings shall
be electronically recorded. The magistrate shall assist the parties in
developing relevant and reliable evidence.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 16 of 69
Sec. 26. 4 V.S.A. § 491 is amended to read:
§ 491. QUALIFICATION OF JUSTICE OF THE PEACE—FILING OF
OATH OR AFFIRMATION AND CERTIFICATE
(a) Before entering upon his or her any duties, each justice of the peace
shall deposit with the town clerk a signed copy of his or her official oath,
signed by himself or herself the justice’s official oath or affirmation, along
with a certificate of the magistrate or notary public administering the same
who administered the oath or affirmation to the justice. The Secretary of State
shall provide oath or affirmation forms for this purpose.
(b) The term of office of justices of the peace shall be two years, and shall
commence on the first day of February next after their election.
Sec. 27. 4 V.S.A. § 608(f) is amended to read:
(f) In the performance of its official functions, the Joint Committee on
Judicial Retention may by a majority vote of its membership issue subpoenas
to compel the attendance of witnesses to testify under oath or affirmation and
to produce documents.
Sec. 28. 4 V.S.A. § 794 is amended to read:
§ 794. OATH OR AFFIRMATION; CORRECTNESS OF REPORTS AND
COPIES
Upon appointment, a stenographic reporter shall be sworn take an oath or
affirmation before entering upon his or her any duties and shall be responsible

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 17 of 69
for the correctness of his or her the reporter’s own reports and of certified
copies thereof made by him or her or under his or her of reports made by the
reporter or at the reporter’s direction.
Sec. 29. 4 V.S.A. § 803 is amended to read:
§ 803. ELECTRONIC RECORDING EQUIPMENT
* * *
(b) For the purpose of operating recording equipment, the judge may
appoint or designate the official reporter of that court, a special reporter, the
clerk of the court, any staff of the court, the court officer, or any other
designated court personnel. The person operating recording equipment shall
subscribe to an oath or affirmation that the operator will well and truly operate
it to record all matters and proceedings.
(c) The court may then designate the person operating the equipment or
any other competent person to read the recording and to transcribe it into
typewriting. The person transcribing the recording shall subscribe to an oath
or affirmation that it has truly and correctly been transcribed.
* * *
Sec. 30. 4 V.S.A. § 851 is amended to read:
§ 851. APPOINTMENT AND POWERS OF COMMISSIONERS
The Governor may appoint commissioners in other states and in foreign
countries who shall hold office for five years unless sooner removed by him or

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 18 of 69
her the Governor. They may take depositions, affidavits, and testimony to be
used in any proceedings in Superior Court; administer oaths and affirmations;
and take the acknowledgment of deeds and other instruments to be used or
recorded in this State, and their acts in other states or foreign countries shall
have the same force as though performed by a justice or master in this State.
Sec. 31. 4 V.S.A. § 852 is amended to read:
§ 852. OATH OR AFFIRMATION AND BOND
Before entering upon his or her any duties, each commissioner shall take
and subscribe an oath or affirmation of office before a magistrate of his or her
the commissioner’s locality and execute a bond to this State with sureties to
the satisfaction of the Governor in the sum of $500.00, conditioned for the
faithful performance of his or her the commissioner’s duties. The bond shall
be kept in the office Office of the Secretary of State, and an action may be
maintained against any or all signers thereof of the bond, in the name of the
State, for the benefit of a person injured by the act or neglect of the
commissioner.
Sec. 32. 4 V.S.A. § 1106(b) is amended to read:
(b) The hearing shall be held before a hearing officer and conducted in an
impartial manner. The hearing officer may, by subpoena, compel the
attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of books and
records. All witnesses shall be sworn or shall make an affirmation. The

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 19 of 69
burden of proof shall be on the State or municipality to prove the allegations
by clear and convincing evidence. As used in this section, “clear and
convincing evidence” means evidence that establishes that the truth of the facts
asserted is highly probable. Certified copies of records supplied by the
Department of Motor Vehicles or the Agency of Natural Resources and
presented by the issuing officer or other person shall be admissible without
testimony by a representative of the Department of Motor Vehicles or the
Agency of Natural Resources.
* * * Title 5 * * *
Sec. 33. 5 V.S.A. § 32 is amended to read:
§ 32. PRODUCTION AND EXAMINATION OF BOOKS; WITNESSES
So far as is necessary for the performance of their duties, the members of
the Transportation Board or the Secretary of Transportation or his or her
designee and any other employee of the Agency authorized by the Secretary
shall have power to examine the books, accounts, and papers of any person,
receiver, trustee, or lessee owning or operating any line, plant, or property,
subject to the Board’s or the Agency’s jurisdiction, that in any way relate to or
contain entries, data, or memoranda concerning any transaction substantially
affecting the interests of the State of Vermont or consumers of transportation
services within the State. In addition to these powers, they may subpoena

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 20 of 69
witnesses, administer oaths and affirmations to witnesses, and examine them
on all matters over which the Board or Agency has jurisdiction.
Sec. 34. 5 V.S.A. § 34 is amended to read:
§ 34. REFUSALTO SHOW BOOKS; FALSE OATH OR AFFIRMATION;
PENALTIES
A person, company, or corporation subject to the supervision of the Board
or the Agency who refuses the Board or the Agency access to its books,
accounts, or papers so far as may be necessary under the provisions of this
chapter, or who fails or refuses to furnish any returns, reports, or information
lawfully required by it, or who willfully hinders, delays, or obstructs it in the
discharge of the duties imposed upon it, or who fails within a reasonable time
to obey a final order or decree of the Board, shall be fined not more than
$5,000.00. An individual who knowingly, under oath or affirmation, makes a
false return or statement or gives false information to the Board or the Agency,
or who knowingly testifies falsely in any material matter before either of them,
shall be deemed to have committed perjury and shall be punished accordingly.
Sec. 35. 5 V.S.A. § 1016(d) is amended to read:
(d) The board shall adopt rules in accordance with the provisions of the
ordinance or resolution by which it was created. Meetings of the board shall
be held at the call of the chair and at such other times as the board may
determine. The chair, or in his or her the chair’s absence the acting chair, may

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 21 of 69
administer oaths and affirmations and compel the attendance of witnesses. All
hearings of the board shall be public. The board shall keep minutes of its
proceedings, showing the vote of each member upon each question, or, if
absent or failing to vote, indicating this fact. The board shall keep records of
its examinations and other official actions, all of which shall immediately be
filed in the office of the board and shall be a public record.
Sec. 36. 5 V.S.A. § 1017(c) is amended to read:
(c) The board of adjustment shall not be required to return the original
papers acted upon by it, but it shall be sufficient to return certified or, sworn,
or affirmed copies or of portions of copies that may be called for by the court.
Sec. 37. 5 V.S.A. § 3756 is amended to read:
§ 3756. OATH OR AFFIRMATION OF OFFICE
Each police officer so commissioned pursuant to section 3755 of this
chapter shall, before entering upon the duties of his or her the office, take an
oath or affirmation of office administered by the Commissioner of Public
Safety or his or her designee.
* * * Title 6 * * *
Sec. 38. 6 V.S.A. § 1(a) is amended to read:
(a) The Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets shall be administered by
a Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets. The Secretary shall supervise

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 22 of 69
and be responsible for the execution and enforcement of all laws relating to
agriculture and standards of weight and measure. The Secretary may:
* * *
(5) Issue subpoenas and administer oaths and affirmations in connection
with an authorized investigation or hearing.
* * *
Sec. 39. 6 V.S.A. § 11 is amended to read:
§ 11. ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS; HEARING OFFICERS
The Secretary may designate a hearing officer to preside in his or her the
Secretary’s place in all matters in which the Secretary is required or permitted
by law to conduct a hearing. The hearing officer may administer oaths and
affirmations or issue subpoenas in connection with a hearing. The hearing
officer shall report findings of fact to the Secretary in writing, within a
reasonable time after the conclusion of the hearing, in contested cases within
the meaning of 3 V.S.A. § 801(b)(2). Judgment on the findings in cases
covered by this section shall be rendered only by the Secretary.
Sec. 40. 6 V.S.A. § 2674(a) is amended to read:
(a) On or before March 1 of each year, all handlers shall send the Secretary
a full and accurate report of the amount of business done during the preceding
year, together with such other statistical information as the Secretary may
require. Failure to file requested information shall be grounds for suspension

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 23 of 69
of license. If the handler purchases milk from a Vermont farm, a cooperative
representing a Vermont farm, or a marketing service owned by a cooperative,
the handler, in addition to any other information required by the Secretary,
shall provide the following information:
* * *
(2) a sworn or affirmed balance sheet showing assets and liabilities and
a profit and loss statement as of the end of the handler’s preceding fiscal year
and such other information regarding its financial condition as the Secretary
may require; and
* * *
Sec. 41. 6 V.S.A. § 2722 is amended to read:
§ 2722. APPLICATION
Applications shall be completely filled out and sworn to or affirmed by the
applicant or a partner or officer of the applicant and in case of renewal shall be
filed with the Secretary on or before July 15 of each year. New handlers may
apply for a license at any time. Renewal applications not received on or before
August 15 shall be assessed a late fee of $100.00. The application for a
handler’s license shall provide the following information and such other
information as the Secretary by regulation rule shall reasonably require:
* * *

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 24 of 69
(3) In the case of a new application, the applicant shall provide the
following information:
* * *
(B) The anticipated supply of milk and the daily quantity to be
purchased from such sources. If a handler buys milk or represents that he or
she the handler intends to buy milk from Vermont producers, he or she the
handler shall provide a sworn or affirmed balance sheet showing assets and
liabilities and a profit and loss statement as of the end of the handler’s
preceding fiscal year and such other information regarding its financial
condition as the Secretary may require. Upon the request of the Secretary, the
financial statements shall be accompanied by an opinion of a certified public
accountant.
* * *
Sec. 42. 6 V.S.A. § 2762 is amended to read:
§ 2762. PRODUCER AFFIDAVIT; VOLUNTARY LABELING
A milk handler may claim in the label on a container or package of milk, or
of a dairy product offered for retail sale in Vermont, or in a written display at
the point of sale of such milk or dairy product, that the milk or dairy product is
derived from cows not treated with rbST, provided that:
(1) Producer affidavit. Each milk producer supplying the handler with
milk to be so identified shall, by affidavit, notify the handler that milk sold to

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 25 of 69
the handler is from cows that are not, and have not been within 90 days prior
to the notification, treated with rbST, and swears or affirms that he or she the
milk producer will notify his or her the handler at least 90 days before using
rbST in the production of milk by such cows.
(2) Handler affidavit.
(A) The milk handler shall, by affidavit, notify the Secretary of the
handler’s practices adopted to ensure that milk from cows not treated with
rbST is kept separate from other milk throughout the collection, transportation,
and processing steps until the finished milk or dairy product is in final
packaged form in a labeled container and swears or affirms that the handler
will notify the Secretary at least 90 days before ceasing use of such practices.
* * *
Sec. 43. 6 V.S.A. § 2929 is amended to read:
§ 2929. POWER TO MAKE ORDERS AND CONDUCT HEARINGS;
RULES
(a) In administering this chapter, the Commission shall have the power to
make orders under this section, conduct hearings, subpoena, and examine
under oath or affirmation producers, handlers, and distributors, their books,
records, documents, correspondence, and accounts, and any other person it
deems necessary to carry out the purposes and intent of this chapter.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 26 of 69
(b) Any order issued under this chapter shall only be made final after a
public hearing and after publication of a proposed order for public review and
comment for 30 days following the publication of the proposed order.
* * *
(2) Interested persons shall not be considered “parties,” and, except as
otherwise specifically provided by subsection (c) of this section, the provisions
of 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 relating to contested cases shall not apply to the
procedure for the conduct of the hearing, the issuance of a proposed pricing
order, or the promulgation of a final order. The hearing on the proposed order
shall be held in accordance with the applicable provisions of 3 V.S.A. § 840(c)
and (d), other than the provisions relating to notice and the requirements of 3
V.S.A. § 832a. The hearing procedure shall provide for the establishment of a
formal record of sworn or affirmed evidence received, matters officially
noticed, questions and offers of proof submitted by interested persons, and any
proposed findings presented.
* * *
Sec. 44. 6 V.S.A. § 2972(b) is amended to read:
(b) Included among the powers of the Council in connection with the
enforcement of this chapter are the powers to require reports from any person
subject to this chapter; to adopt, rescind, modify, and amend all proper and
necessary rules and orders to administer this chapter, which rules and orders

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 27 of 69
shall be adopted by publication in the manner prescribed by the Council and
shall have the force and effect of law when not inconsistent with existing laws;
to administer oaths and affirmations, subpoena witnesses, take depositions, and
certify to official acts; to require any dealer to keep such true and accurate
records and to make such reports covering purchases, sales, and receipts of
dairy products and related matters as the Council deems reasonably necessary
for effective administration, which records shall be open to inspection by the
Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets at any reasonable time and as
often as may be necessary, but information thus obtained shall not be
published or be open to public inspection in any manner revealing any
individual dealer’s identity, except as required in proceedings to enforce
compliance; to keep accurate books, records, and accounts of all of its
dealings; and to make annually a full report of its doings to the House
Committee on Agriculture, Food Resiliency, and Forestry and the Senate
Committee on Agriculture and the Governor, which shall show the amount of
money received and the expenditures thereof. The report shall be submitted on
or before January 15. The Vermont Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets
shall perform the administrative work of the Council as directed by the
Council. The Council shall reimburse the Agency of Agriculture, Food and
Markets for the cost of services performed by the Agency.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 28 of 69
Sec. 45. 6 V.S.A. § 3318 is amended to read:
§ 3318. INVESTIGATION; RECORD KEEPING
(a) The Secretary shall also have power:
* * *
(2) To require, by general or special orders, persons engaged in
intrastate commerce to file with the Secretary, in the form that the Secretary
may prescribe, annual or special reports or answers in writing to specific
questions. The person filing the reports or answers shall furnish the Secretary
with any information he or she the Secretary may require as to the
organization, business, conduct, practices, management, and relation to other
persons. The reports and answers shall be made under oath or affirmation, or
otherwise, as the Secretary may prescribe and shall be filed with the Secretary
within a reasonable period as the Secretary may prescribe, unless additional
time is granted by the Secretary.
(b) For the purpose of this chapter, the Secretary shall at all reasonable
times have access to and the right to copy any documentary evidence of any
person being investigated or proceeded against. The Secretary may subpoena
the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of all
documentary evidence of any person relating to any matter under investigation
or subject to administrative hearing. The Secretary or his or her designee may

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 29 of 69
sign subpoenas and may administer oaths and affirmations, examine witnesses,
and receive evidence.
(1) The attendance of witnesses and the production of documentary
evidence may be required at any designated place of hearing. In case of
disobedience to a subpoena, the Secretary may invoke the aid of any district or
Superior Court in requiring the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the
production of documentary evidence.
(2) Any district or Superior Court within the jurisdiction in which an
inquiry is carried on may, in case of resistance or refusal to obey a subpoena
issued to any person, issue an order requiring the person to appear before the
Secretary or to produce documentary evidence or to give evidence touching
the matter in question. Any failure to obey an order of the court may be
punished by the court as a contempt.
* * *
(4) The Secretary may order testimony to be taken by deposition in any
proceeding or investigation pending under this chapter at any stage of the
proceeding or investigation. The depositions may be taken before any person
designated by the Secretary who has the power to administer oaths and
affirmations. The testimony shall be reduced to writing by the person taking
the deposition, or under his or her that person’s direction, and shall be
subscribed by the deponent. Any person may be compelled to appear and

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 30 of 69
depose and to produce documentary evidence in the same manner as witnesses
may be compelled to appear and testify and produce documentary evidence
before the Secretary as provided in this chapter.
* * *
* * * Title 7 * * *
Sec. 46. 7 V.S.A. § 211(b) is amended to read:
(b) The hearing officer may administer oaths and affirmations in all cases,
so far as the exercise of that power is properly incidental to the performance of
the hearing officer’s duty or that of the Board. A hearing officer may hold any
hearing in any matter within the jurisdiction of the Board.
Sec. 47. 7 V.S.A. § 588 is amended to read:
§ 588. FEES OF SHERIFF, CONSTABLE, OR POLICE OFFICER
When a sheriff, constable, or police officer makes a search under this title
pursuant to a warrant, he or she the officer shall receive a fee for the search,
reimbursement for mileage at the rate set pursuant to 32 V.S.A. § 1267, and
the sum that he or she the officer actually paid out for necessary assistance, if:
(1) the Commissioner of Liquor and Lottery deems the amount to be
reasonable; and
(2) the officer declares under oath or affirmation that the money was
expended as claimed, and, if applicable, states the name of his or her the
officer’s assistant and the amount paid for the assistance.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 31 of 69
* * * Title 8 * * *
Sec. 48. 8 V.S.A. § 13(a) is amended to read:
(a) In addition to any other penalties, and in order to enforce this title, 9
V.S.A. chapters 131 and 150, Title 9A, and 18 V.S.A. chapter 221, the
Commissioner may issue subpoenas, examine persons, administer oaths and
affirmations, and require production of papers and records. Any subpoena or
notice to produce may be served by registered or certified mail or in person by
an agent of the Commissioner. Service by registered or certified mail shall be
effective three business days after mailing. Any subpoena or notice to produce
shall provide at least sixbusiness days’ time from service within which to
comply, except that the Commissioner may shorten the time for compliance for
good cause shown. Any subpoena or notice to produce sent by registered or
certified mail, postage prepaid, shall constitute service on the person to whom
it is addressed. Each witness who appears before the Commissioner under
subpoena shall receive a fee and mileage as provided for witnesses in civil
cases in Superior Courts; provided, however, that any person subject to
regulation under this title shall not be eligible to receive fees or mileage under
this section.
Sec. 49. 8 V.S.A. § 2102(a) is amended to read:
(a) Application for a license or registration shall be in writing, under oath
or affirmation, and in the form prescribed by the Commissioner, and shall

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 32 of 69
contain the legal name, any fictitious name or trade name, and the address of
the residence and place of business of the applicant; if the applicant is a
partnership corporation, limited liability company, partnership, or other entity,
the name and title of each key individual and person in control of the
applicant; the county and municipality with street and number, if any, where
the business is to be conducted; and such further information as the
Commissioner may require.
Sec. 50. 8 V.S.A. § 2117(b) is amended to read:
(b)(1) The Commissioner may review, investigate, or examine any person,
regardless of whether the person has obtained a license under this part, as often
as necessary in order to carry out the purposes of this part.
(2) The Commissioner may direct, subpoena, or order the attendance of,
and examine under oath or affirmation, a person whose testimony is required
about the loans or the business or subject matter of an examination or
investigation, and may direct, subpoena, or order the person to produce books,
accounts, records, files, and any other documents the Commissioner deems
relevant to the inquiry.
Sec. 51. 8 V.S.A. § 2120(a) is amended to read:
(a)(1) In addition to any specific information required by the applicable
chapter, annually, on or before April 1, a licensee shall file a report with the
Commissioner to provide the information the Commissioner reasonably

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 33 of 69
requires concerning the business and operations conducted in this State during
the preceding calendar year.
(2) The licensee shall submit the report under oath or affirmation and in
the form the Commissioner requires.
* * *
Sec. 52. 8 V.S.A. § 2202a(a) is amended to read:
(a) Application for a license for a lender making solely commercial loans
shall be in writing, under oath or affirmation, and in the form prescribed by the
Commissioner, and shall contain the name and address of the residence and the
place of business of the applicant and, if the applicant is a partnership or
association, of every member thereof, and, if a corporation, of each officer,
director, and control person thereof; the county and municipality with street
and number, if any, where the business is to be conducted; and such further
information as the Commissioner may require.
Sec. 53. 8 V.S.A. § 2236a is amended to read:
§ 2236a. EXTENT OF ASSIGNMENT; SERVICE UPON EMPLOYER
Under any such assignment or order for the payment of future salary,
wages, commissions, or other compensation for services given as security for a
loan made by any licensee under this chapter, a sum not to exceed 10 percent
of the borrower’s salary, wages, commissions, or other compensation for
services shall be collectible from the employer of the borrower by the licensee

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 34 of 69
at the time of each payment to the borrower of such salary, wages,
commissions, or other compensation for services, from the time that a copy of
such assignment, verified by the oath or affirmation of the licensee or the
licensee’s agent, together with a similarly verified statement of the amount
unpaid upon such loan, is served upon the employer.
Sec. 54. 8 V.S.A. § 2260(a) is amended to read:
(a) Annually, on or before April 1, each company registered under this
chapter shall file a report with the Commissioner under oath or affirmation and
in the form and manner prescribed by the Commissioner. In addition to
information required by section 2120 of this title, the report shall include any
information the Commissioner requires concerning the company’s business
and operations during the preceding calendar year within Vermont and, in
addition, shall include:
* * *
Sec. 55. 8 V.S.A. § 3361(a) is amended to read:
(a) A foreign or alien insurer shall not transact business in this State unless
it first obtains from the Commissioner a license authorizing it to do so. Before
receiving a license, it shall file with the Commissioner a certified copy of its
charter and bylaws, a statement under oath or affirmation of its president and
secretary, showing its financial condition, and any other statements required by
the Commissioner.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 35 of 69
Sec. 56. 8 V.S.A. § 3371(e) is amended to read:
(e) “Surplus to policyholders” for the purposes of this section, in addition
to the insurer’s unassigned capital and surplus, shall be deemed to include any
voluntary reserves which that are not required pursuant to law, and shall be
determined from the last sworn or affirmed statement of the insurer on file
with the Commissioner, or by the last report of examination of the insurer,
whichever is the more recent at time of assumption of risk.
Sec. 57. 8 V.S.A. § 3561(a) is amended to read:
(a) Each domestic, foreign, and alien insurance company doing business in
this state State shall annually submit to the Commissioner a statement of its
financial condition, verified by oath or affirmation of two of its executive
officers. The statement shall be prepared in accordance with the National
Association of Insurance Commissioners’ Instructions Handbook and
Accounting Practices and Procedures Manual and shall be in such general form
and context, as approved by, and shall contain any other information required
by, the National Association of Insurance Commissioners with any useful or
necessary modifications or adaptations thereof required or approved or
accepted by the Commissioner for the type of insurance and kinds of insurers
to be reported upon, and as supplemented by additional information required
by the Commissioner. The statement of an alien insurer shall relate only to the
insurer’s transactions and affairs in the United States unless the Commissioner

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 36 of 69
requires otherwise. A foreign or alien company, upon withdrawing from the
State of Vermont, shall pay to the Commissioner $25.00 for the filing of its
final financial statement.
Sec. 58. 8 V.S.A. § 3565(a) is amended to read:
(a) The Commissioner, inspecting an insurance company, may require its
officers, or any agent thereof, to exhibit books kept by them relating to their
business and may examine under oath or affirmation such agents and officers
and other persons as he or she the Commissioner thinks proper, in relation to
the business transactions and conditions of the company.
Sec. 59. 8 V.S.A. § 3574(b) is amended to read:
(b) Filing of examination report. No Not later than 60 days following
completion of the examination, the examiner in charge shall file with the
Department a written report of examination under oath or affirmation. Upon
receipt of the report, the Department shall transmit the report to the company
examined, together with a notice which that shall afford the company
examined a reasonable opportunity of not more than 30 days to make a written
submission or rebuttal with respect to any matters contained in the examination
report.
Sec. 60. 8 V.S.A. § 3686(f) is amended to read:
(f) Compelling production. In the event the insurer fails to comply with an
order, the Commissioner shall have the power to examine the affiliates to

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 37 of 69
obtain the information. The Commissioner also shall have the power to issue
subpoenas, to administer oaths and affirmations, and to examine under oath or
affirmation any person for purposes of determining compliance with this
section. Upon the failure or refusal of any person to obey a subpoena, the
Commissioner may petition a court of competent jurisdiction, and upon proper
showing, the court may enter an order compelling the witness to appear and
testify or produce documentary evidence. Failure to obey the court order shall
be punishable as contempt of court. Every person shall be obliged to attend as
a witness at the place specified in the subpoena, when subpoenaed, anywhere
within the State. He or she A person who appears as a witness pursuant to a
subpoena shall be entitled to the same fees and mileage, if claimed, as a
witness in the Superior Court of this State, which fees, mileage, and actual
expense, if any, necessarily incurred in securing the attendance of witnesses
and their testimony shall be itemized and charged against and be paid by the
company being examined.
Sec. 61. 8 V.S.A. § 3865 is amended to read:
§ 3865. MILLMUTUAL; FEES
A mutual fire insurance company of another state which that insures only
factories or mills, or property connected with such factories or mills, may be
admitted to transact business in this State upon complying with the conditions

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 38 of 69
set forth in the statutory laws of this State, except that in lieu of all other taxes,
licenses, and fees whatsoever, it shall pay to the Commissioner:
(1) for filing its charter and bylaws, a fee of $30.00;
(2) for filing a statement under oath or affirmation of its president and
secretary, showing its financial condition and standing upon forms furnished
by him or her the Commissioner, a fee of $20.00; and annually thereafter on or
before March 31, it shall pay to the Commissioner a fee of $20.00 for the
filing of its annual statement and an annual license fee of $5.00; and
(3) its fire marshal tax.
Sec. 62. 8 V.S.A. § 3914 is amended to read:
§ 3914. STATEMENT AS TO APPLICATIONS
At the time of such filing, or within one year thereafter, such persons, or
those who have been designated as the president and the secretary of such
corporation, may file with the Commissioner a sworn or affirmed statement to
the effect that applications for insurance in the amounts respectively indicated
in section 3920 of this title have been made in good faith to such corporation.
Such statement shall give the names and addresses of such applicants and the
amount of insurance applied for by each. In case such corporation charges
advance premiums, such statement shall show that the premium, specifying the
amount, has been paid in full by each such applicant.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 39 of 69
Sec. 63. 8 V.S.A. § 4464(4) is amended to read:
(4) Upon receipt of a preliminary certificate from the Commissioner, the
society may solicit members for the purpose of completing its organization,
shall collect from each applicant the amount of not less than one regular
monthly premium in accordance with its table of rates as provided by its
constitution and laws, and shall issue to each such applicant a receipt for the
amount so collected. No society may incur any liability other than for the
return of the advance premium, nor issue any certificate, nor pay, allow, or
offer or promise to pay or allow, any death or disability benefit to any person
until all of the following have occurred:
(A) actual Actual bona fide applications for death benefits have been
secured aggregating at least $500,000.00 on not less than 500 lives;.
(B) all All such applicants for death benefits shall have furnished
evidence of insurability satisfactory to the society;.
(C) certificates Certificates of examinations or acceptable
declarations of insurability have been duly filed and approved by the chief
medical examiner of the society;.
(D) ten Ten subordinate lodges or branches have been established
into which the 500 applicants have been admitted;.
(E) there There has been submitted to the Commissioner under oath
or affirmation of the president or secretary, or corresponding officer of the

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 40 of 69
society, a list of the applicants, giving their names, addresses, date each was
admitted, name and number of the subordinate branch of which each applicant
is a member, amount of benefits to be granted, and premiums therefor; and.
(F) it It has been shown to the Commissioner, by sworn or affirmed
statement of the treasurer, or corresponding officer of the society, that at least
500 applicants have each paid in cash at least one regular monthly premium as
provided in this section, which premiums in the aggregate shall amount to at
least $2,500.00, all of which have been credited to the fund or funds from
which benefits are to be paid and no part of which may be used for expenses.
The advance premiums shall be held in trust during the period of organization,
and if the society has not qualified for a certificate of authority within one
year, as provided in this section, the premiums shall be returned to the
applicants.
Sec. 64. 8 V.S.A. § 4468 is amended to read:
§ 4468. CONSOLIDATIONS AND MERGERS
(a) A domestic society may consolidate or merge with any other society by
complying with the provisions of this section.
(b) It The domestic society shall file with the Commissioner of Financial
Regulation:
(1) a certified copy of the written contract containing in full the terms
and conditions of the consolidation or merger;

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 41 of 69
(2) a sworn or affirmed statement by the president and secretary or
corresponding officers of each society showing the financial condition thereof
of their respective society on a date fixed by the Commissioner of Financial
Regulation but not earlier than December 31, next preceding the date of the
contract;
(3) a certificate of the officers, duly verified by their respective oaths or
affirmations, that the consolidation or merger has been approved by a two-
thirds vote of the supreme legislative or governing body of each society; and
* * *
Sec. 65. 8 V.S.A. § 4485(a) is amended to read:
(a) No foreign or alien society may transact business in this State without a
license issued by the Commissioner of Financial Regulation. Any such society
may be licensed to transact business in this State upon filing with the
Commissioner of Financial Regulation:
* * *
(4) a statement of its business under oath or affirmation of its president
and secretary or corresponding officers in a form prescribed by the
Commissioner of Financial Regulation, duly verified by an examination made
by the supervising insurance official of its home state or other state, territory,
province, or country, satisfactory to the Secretary of State of this State;
* * *

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 42 of 69
Sec. 66. 8 V.S.A. § 4495 is amended to read:
§ 4495. EXAMINATION OF DOMESTIC SOCIETIES
The Commissioner of Financial Regulation, or any person he or she the
Commissioner may appoint, shall have the power of visitation and examination
into the affairs of any domestic society, and he or she the Commissioner or
designee shall make the examination at least once in every three years. He or
she The Commissioner may employ assistants for the purpose of the
examination, and he or she the Commissioner, or any person he or she the
Commissioner may appoint, shall have free access to all books, papers, and
documents that relate to the business of the society. The minutes of the
proceedings of the supreme legislative or governing body and of the board of
directors or corresponding body of a society shall be in the English language.
In making an examination, the Commissioner of Financial Regulation may
summon and qualify as witnesses under oath or affirmation and examine its the
society’s officers, agents, and employees or other persons in relation to the
affairs, transactions, and condition of the society. A summary of the report of
the Commissioner of Financial Regulation and such recommendations or
statements of the Commissioner of Financial Regulation as may accompany
the report, shall be read at the first meeting of the board of directors or
corresponding body of the society following the receipt thereof and, if directed
so to do by the Commissioner of Financial Regulation, shall also be read at the

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 43 of 69
first meeting of the supreme legislative or governing body of the society
following the receipt thereof. A copy of the report, recommendations, and
statements of the Commissioner of Financial Regulation shall be furnished by
the society to each member of the board of directors or other governing body.
The expense of each examination and of each valuation, including
compensation and actual expense of examiners, shall be paid by the society
examined or whose certificates are valued, upon statements furnished by the
Commissioner of Financial Regulation.
Sec. 67. 8 V.S.A. § 4503(b) is amended to read:
(b) A person who willfully makes a false or fraudulent statement in any
verified report or declaration under oath or affirmation required or authorized
by this chapter, or of any material fact or thing contained in a sworn or
affirmed statement concerning the death or disability of a member for the
purpose of procuring payment of a benefit named in the certificate, shall be
guilty of perjury and shall be subject to the penalties for perjury prescribed by
law.
Sec. 68. 8 V.S.A. § 4516 is amended to read:
§ 4516. ANNUALREPORT TO COMMISSIONER
Annually, on or before March 1, a hospital service corporation shall file
with the Commissioner of Financial Regulation a statement sworn to or
affirmed by the president and treasurer of the corporation showing its

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 44 of 69
condition on December 31. The statement shall be in such form and contain
such matters as the Commissioner shall prescribe. To qualify for the tax
exemption set forth in section 4518 of this title, the statement shall include a
certification that the hospital service corporation operates on a nonprofit basis
for the purpose of providing an adequate hospital service plan to individuals of
the State, both groups and nongroups, without discrimination based on age,
gender, geographic area, industry, and medical history, except as allowed by
subdivisions 4080g(b)(7)(B)(ii) and 4080g(c)(8)(B)(ii) of this title and by 33
V.S.A. § 1811(f)(2)(B).
Sec. 69. 8 V.S.A. § 4588 is amended to read:
§ 4588. ANNUALREPORT TO COMMISSIONER
Annually, on or before March 1, a medical service corporation shall file
with the Commissioner of Financial Regulation a statement sworn to or
affirmed by the president and treasurer of the corporation showing its
condition on December 31, which shall be in such form and contain such
matters as the Commissioner shall prescribe. To qualify for the taxexemption
set forth in section 4590 of this title, the statement shall include a certification
that the medical service corporation operates on a nonprofit basis for the
purpose of providing an adequate medical service plan to individuals of the
State, both groups and nongroups, without discrimination based on age,
gender, geographic area, industry, and medical history, except as allowed by

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 45 of 69
subdivisions 4080g(b)(7)(B)(ii) and 4080g(c)(8)(B)(ii) of this title and by
33 V.S.A. § 1811(f)(2)(B).
Sec. 69. 8 V.S.A. § 4588 is amended to read:
§ 4588. ANNUAL REPORT TO COMMISSIONER
Annually, on or before March 1, a medical service corporation shall file
with the Commissioner of Financial Regulation a statement sworn to or
affirmed by the president and treasurer of the corporation showing its
condition on December 31, which shall be in such form and contain such
matters as the Commissioner shall prescribe. To qualify for the tax exemption
set forth in section 4590 of this title, the statement shall include a certification
that the medical service corporation operates on a nonprofit basis for the
purpose of providing an adequate medical service plan to individuals of the
State, both groups and nongroups, without discrimination based on age,
gender, geographic area, industry, and medical history, except as allowed by
V.S.A. § 1811(f)(2)(B).
Sec. 70. 8 V.S.A. § 5105(b) is amended to read:
(b) All financial and market conduct examinations shall be conducted
pursuant to and in conformity with sections 3573, 3574, 3575, and 3576 of this
title at the expense of the health maintenance organization and shall be
conducted in accordance with guidelines, principles, manuals, instructions, and
other procedures promulgated by the National Association of Insurance

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 46 of 69
Commissioners, including the use of statutory accounting principles for
financial examinations, together with any useful or necessary modifications or
adaptation thereof required or approved by the Commissioner. Every health
maintenance organization shall provide the Commissioner with all books and
records relating to its operation, including books and records of any affiliate or
subsidiary as defined in section 3681 of this title. For the purpose of
examinations, the Commissioner may issue subpoenas to, administer oaths and
affirmations to, and examine any person and the officers and agents of the
health maintenance organization.
Sec. 71. 8 V.S.A. § 6004(d) is amended to read:
(d) Within 30 days after commencing business, each captive insurance
company shall file with the Commissioner a statement under oath or
affirmation of its president and secretary certifying that the captive insurance
company possessed the requisite unimpaired paid-in capital and surplus prior
to commencing business.
Sec. 71. 8 V.S.A. § 6004(d) is amended to read:
(d) Within 30 days after commencing business, each captive insurance
company shall file with the Commissioner a statement under oath or
affirmation of its president and secretary or, in the case of a captive insurance
company formed as a limited liability company or as a reciprocal insurer, of
two individuals authorized by the governing board certifying that the captive

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 47 of 69
insurance company possessed the requisite unimpaired, paid-in capital and
surplus prior to commencing business.
Sec. 72. 8 V.S.A. § 6007(b) is amended to read:
(b) Prior to March 1 of each year, and prior to March 15 of each year in the
case of pure captive insurance companies, association captive insurance
companies, sponsored captive insurance companies, industrial insured captive
insurance companies, or agency captive insurance companies, each captive
insurance company shall submit to the Commissioner a report of its financial
condition, verified by oath or affirmation of two of its executive officers.
Each captive insurance company shall report using generally accepted
accounting principles, statutory accounting principles, or international
financial reporting standards unless the Commissioner requires, approves, or
accepts the use of any other comprehensive basis of accounting, in each case
with any appropriate or necessary modifications or adaptations thereof
required or approved or accepted by the Commissioner for the type of
insurance and kinds of insurers to be reported upon, and as supplemented by
additional information required by the Commissioner. As used in this section,
statutory accounting principles shall mean the accounting principles codified in
the NAIC Accounting Practices and Procedures Manual. Upon application for
admission, a captive insurance company shall select, with explanation, an
accounting method for reporting. Any change in a captive insurance

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 48 of 69
company’s accounting method shall require prior approval. Except as
otherwise provided, each risk retention group shall file its report in the form
required by subsection 3561(a) of this title, and each risk retention group shall
comply with the requirements set forth in section 3569 of this title. The
Commissioner shall by rule propose the forms in which pure captive insurance
companies, association captive insurance companies, sponsored captive
insurance companies, and industrial insured captive insurance companies shall
report. Subdivision 6002(c)(3) of this title shall apply to each report filed
pursuant to this section.
Sec. 72. 8 V.S.A. § 6007(b) is amended to read:
(b) Prior to March 1 of each year, and prior to March 15 of each year in
the case of pure captive insurance companies, association captive insurance
companies, sponsored captive insurance companies, industrial insured captive
insurance companies, or agency captive insurance companies, each captive
insurance company shall submit to the Commissioner a report of its financial
condition, verified by oath or affirmation of two of its executive officers or, in
the case of a captive insurance company formed as a limited liability company
or as a reciprocal insurer, of two individuals authorized by the governing
board. Each captive insurance company shall report using generally accepted
accounting principles, statutory accounting principles, or international
financial reporting standards unless the Commissioner requires, approves, or

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 49 of 69
accepts the use of any other comprehensive basis of accounting, in each case
with any appropriate or necessary modifications or adaptations thereof
required or approved or accepted by the Commissioner for the type of
insurance and kinds of insurers to be reported upon, and as supplemented by
additional information required by the Commissioner. As used in this section,
statutory accounting principles shall mean the accounting principles codified
in the NAIC Accounting Practices and Procedures Manual. Upon application
for admission, a captive insurance company shall select, with explanation, an
accounting method for reporting. Any change in a captive insurance
company’s accounting method shall require prior approval. Except as
otherwise provided, each risk retention group shall file its report in the form
required by subsection 3561(a) of this title, and each risk retention group shall
comply with the requirements set forth in section 3569 of this title. The
Commissioner shall by rule propose the forms in which pure captive insurance
companies, association captive insurance companies, sponsored captive
insurance companies, and industrial insured captive insurance companies
shall report. Subdivision 6002(c)(3) of this title shall apply to each report filed
pursuant to this section, except that such subdivision shall not apply to reports
filed by risk retention groups.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 50 of 69
Sec. 73. 8 V.S.A. § 6024(c) is amended to read:
(c) A dormant captive insurance company that has been issued a certificate
of dormancy shall:
* * *
(2) prior to March 15 of each year, submit to the Commissioner a report
of its financial condition, verified by oath or affirmation of two of its executive
officers, in a form as may be prescribed by the Commissioner; and
* * *
Sec. 73. 8 V.S.A. § 6024(c) is amended to read:
(c) A dormant captive insurance company that has been issued a certificate
of dormancy shall:
* * *
(2) prior to March 15 of each year, submit to the Commissioner a report
of its financial condition, verified by oath or affirmation of two of its executive
officers or, in the case of a captive insurance company formed as a limited
liability company or as a reciprocal insurer, of two individuals authorized by
its governing board, in a form as may be prescribed by the Commissioner; and
* * *

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 51 of 69
Sec. 74. 8 V.S.A. § 6045 is amended to read:
§ 6045. BRANCH CAPTIVE REPORTS
Prior to March 15 of each year, or with the approval of the Commissioner
within 75 days after its fiscal year-end, a branch captive insurance company
shall file with the Commissioner a copy of all reports and statements required
to be filed under the laws of the jurisdiction in which the alien captive
insurance company is formed, verified by oath or affirmation of two of its
executive officers. If the Commissioner is satisfied that the annual report filed
by the alien captive insurance company in its domiciliary jurisdiction provides
adequate information concerning the financial condition of the alien captive
insurance company, the Commissioner may waive the requirement for
completion of the captive annual statement for business written in the alien
jurisdiction.
Sec. 75. 8 V.S.A. § 7051 is amended to read:
§ 7051. GROUNDS FOR REHABILITATION
The Commissioner may petition the Superior Court of Washington County
for an order authorizing him or her the Commissioner to rehabilitate a
domestic insurer or an alien insurer domiciled in this State on one or more of
the following grounds:
* * *

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 52 of 69
(5) A person who in fact has executive authority in the insurer, whether
an officer, manager, general agent, director or trustee, employee, or other
person, has refused to be examined under oath or affirmation by the
Commissioner concerning the insurer’s affairs, whether in this State or
elsewhere; and, after reasonable notice of the allegation, the insurer has failed
promptly and effectively to terminate the employment and status of the person
and all his or her the person’s influence on management.
* * *
Sec. 76. 8 V.S.A. § 7060(a) is amended to read:
(a) The liquidator shall have the power to:
* * *
(5) Hold hearings, subpoena witnesses to compel their attendance,
administer oaths and affirmations, examine any person under oath or
affirmation, and compel any person to subscribe to testimony after it has been
correctly reduced to writing; and in connection with such proceedings, require
the production of any books, papers, records, or other documents that he or she
the liquidator deems relevant to the inquiry.
* * *
Sec. 77. 8 V.S.A. § 7075(c) is amended to read:
(c) At any time, the liquidator may request the claimant to present
information or evidence supplementary to that required under subsection (a) of

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 53 of 69
this section and may take testimony under oath or affirmation, require
production of affidavits or depositions, or otherwise obtain additional
information or evidence.
Sec. 78. 8 V.S.A. § 7112 is amended to read:
§ 7112. APPLICATION; FEE; PLAN
* * *
(b) A plan shall include the following:
* * *
(5) Certificates issued by the domicile regulator of the transferring
insurer and, if applicable, of any controlling party that is a regulated insurance
company, in each case attesting to the good standing of the transferring insurer
and the controlling party under the insurance regulatory laws of the
jurisdiction of their respective domiciles; or, if any such certificate is not
obtainable under the laws or practices of a domicile regulator, a certificate of
the transferring insurer or the controlling party, as applicable, attesting to the
foregoing, verified by oath or affirmation of two of its executive officers.
(6) A letter of no objection, or the equivalent, from the domicile
regulator of the transferring insurer confirming that the regulator has no
objection to the transfer of the closed block under the plan; or, if any such
certificate is not obtainable under the laws or practices of a domicile regulator,
a certificate of the transferring insurer or the controlling party, as applicable,

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 54 of 69
attesting to the foregoing, verified by oath or affirmation of two of its
executive officers.
* * *
Sec. 79. 8 V.S.A. § 13103(e)(4) is amended to read:
(4) The temporary secretary shall make and attest a record of the
proceedings until the secretary has been chosen and sworn or affirmed,
including a record of such choice and qualification.
Sec. 80. 8 V.S.A. § 14405 is amended to read:
§ 14405. POWERS AND DUTIES OF OFFICERS
In proceedings in the Probate Division of the Superior Court or elsewhere,
connected with authority exercised as executor, administrator, receiver,
assignee, trustee, or guardian, all accounts, returns, and other papers may be
signed and sworn to in or affirmed on behalf of such a financial institution
exercising trust powers by any officer thereof of the financial institution duly
authorized by it. The answers and examinations of that officer, under oath or
affirmation, shall be received as the answers and examinations of the financial
institution. The court may order and compel any and all officers of the
financial institution to answer and attend the examinations, in the same manner
as if they, personally, were parties to the proceeding or inquiry. Such a
financial institution shall not be required to receive or hold any property or
money or to execute any trust contrary to its own desire.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 55 of 69
Sec. 81. 8 V.S.A. § 30501(a) is amended to read:
(a) The Commissioner shall require each credit union to submit a quarterly
report of its condition within 30 days of following the end of each calendar
quarter in such manner and on such forms as the Commissioner may require.
Reports shall be verified to be true, correct, and complete by the oath or
affirmation of the person preparing the report.
Sec. 82. 8 V.S.A. § 31103(e)(3) is amended to read:
(3) The temporary secretary shall make and attest to a record of the
proceedings until the secretary has been chosen and sworn or affirmed,
including a record of such choice and qualification.
Sec. 83. 8 V.S.A. § 31309 is amended to read:
§ 31309. OATHS AND AFFIRMATIONS OF OFFICE; CERTIFICATE OF
ELECTION
(a) Within 10 days after election to any position, each person so elected or
appointed shall execute an oath or affirmation of office by which he or she the
person agrees to accept, and diligently and faithfully to carry out, the duties
and responsibilities of the position to which he or she the person has been
elected and not negligently or willfully to violate, or permit to be violated, any
provision of this title or the bylaws of the credit union.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 56 of 69
(b) The chairperson of the governing body and the secretary shall execute a
certificate of election, which shall set forth the names and addresses of the
officers, directors, and committee members elected or appointed.
(c) The oath or affirmation of office and the certificate of election shall be
executed on forms prepared by the Department, and one copy of each shall be
filed with the Department within 15 days after the election or appointment.
* * * Title 9 * * *
Sec. 84. 9 V.S.A. § 280 is amended to read:
§ 280. NOTARIZATION AND ACKNOWLEDGMENT
If a law requires a signature or record to be notarized, acknowledged,
verified, or made under oath or affirmation, the requirement is satisfied if the
electronic signature of the person authorized to perform those acts, together
with all other information required to be included by other applicable law, is
attached to or logically associated with the signature or record.
Sec. 85. 9 V.S.A. § 2156 is amended to read:
§ 2156. ASSIGNEE’S DUTIES
The assignee shall proceed with reasonable dispatch in the discharge of his
or her the assignee’s trust to the its completion of the same. When completed,
he or she the assignee shall file with the clerk of such the Superior Court for
the district in which the assignor resides a copy of the settlement of his or her
the assignee’s trust account showing in detail how he or she the assignee has

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 57 of 69
administered the trust, which account shall be verified by the oath or
affirmation of the assignee as a true and just account, and the same shall
remain on file in such office for the inspection of the creditors of the assignor.
Sec. 86. 9 V.S.A. § 2157 is amended to read:
§ 2157. APPLICATION TO SUPERIOR JUDGE FOR SETTLEMENT OF
ACCOUNT BY ASSIGNEE
If, in the opinion of a creditor of the assignor named in the assignment, the
assignee neglects to settle his or her the assignee’s trust and file a copy of his
or her the assignee’s account with the county clerk of the Superior Court for
the district in which the assignor resides for an unreasonable length of time,
such creditor may apply to a Superior judge for an order upon the assignee to
settle the same and file with the clerk of such court a copy of his or her the
assignee’s trust account verified by oath or affirmation within such time as the
Superior judge deems proper.
Sec. 87. 9 V.S.A. § 2435(b) is amended to read:
(b) Notice of breach.
* * *
(3) A data collector or other entity subject to this subchapter shall
provide notice of a breach to the Attorney General or to the Department of
Financial Regulation, as applicable, as follows:
* * *

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 58 of 69
(B)(i) The data collector shall notify the Attorney General or the
Department, as applicable, of the date of the security breach and the date of
discovery of the breach and shall provide a preliminary description of the
breach within 14 business days, consistent with the legitimate needs of the law
enforcement agency as provided in this subdivision (3) and subdivision (4) of
this subsection (b), of the data collector’s discovery of the security breach or
when the data collector provides notice to consumers pursuant to this section,
whichever is sooner.
(ii) Notwithstanding subdivision (B)(i) of this subdivision (b)(3),
a data collector who, prior to the date of the breach, on a form and in a manner
prescribed by the Attorney General, had sworn or affirmed in writing to the
Attorney General that it maintains written policies and procedures to maintain
the security of personally identifiable information or login credentials and
respond to a breach in a manner consistent with Vermont law shall notify the
Attorney General of the date of the security breach and the date of discovery
of the breach and shall provide a description of the breach prior to providing
notice of the breach to consumers pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection
(b).
* * *

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 59 of 69
Sec. 88. 9 V.S.A. § 2460(a) is amended to read:
(a)(1) The Attorney General or a State’s Attorney, whenever he or she the
Attorney General or State’s Attorney has reason to believe any person to be or
to have been in violation of section 2453 of this title, or of any rule or
regulation made adopted pursuant to section 2453 of this title, may examine or
cause to be examined by any agent or representative designated by him or her
the Attorney General or State’s Attorney for that purpose, any books, records,
papers, memoranda, and physical objects of whatever nature bearing upon
each alleged violation, and may demand written responses under oath or
affirmation to questions bearing upon each alleged violation.
(2) The Attorney General or a State’s Attorney may require the
attendance of such person or of any other person having knowledge in the
premises in the county where the person resides or has a place of business, or
in Washington County if the person is a nonresident or has no place of
business, within the State,; may take testimony and require proof material for
his or her the person’s information,; and may administer oaths and
affirmations or take acknowledgment in respect of with respect to any book,
record, paper, or memorandum.
* * *

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 60 of 69
Sec. 89. 9 V.S.A. § 2518(d)(1) is amended to read:
(d)(1) Civil investigation. Whenever the Attorney General has reason to
believe any person to be or to have been in violation of section 2517 of this
title, the Attorney General may examine or cause to be examined by any agent
or representative designated by the Attorney General for that purpose, any
books, records, papers, memoranda, and physical objects of whatever nature
bearing upon each alleged violation, and may demand written responses under
oath or affirmation to questions bearing upon each alleged violation. The
Attorney General may require the attendance of such person or of any other
person having knowledge in the county where such person resides or has a
place of business, or in Washington County if such person is a nonresident or
has no place of business within the State, and; may take testimony and require
proof material for his or her the person’s information,; and may administer
oaths and affirmations or take acknowledgement in respect of with respect to
any book, record, paper, or memorandum. The Attorney General shall serve
notice of the time, place, and cause of such examination or attendance, or
notice of the cause of the demand for written responses, at least 10 days prior
to the date of such examination, personally or by certified mail, upon such
person at his or her the person’s principal place of business, or, if such place is
not known, to his or her the person’s last known address. Any book, record,
paper, memorandum, or other information produced by any person pursuant to

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 61 of 69
this subsection shall not, unless otherwise ordered by a court of this State for
good cause shown, be disclosed to any person other than the duly authorized
agent or representative of the Attorney General or a State’s Attorney or
another law enforcement officer engaged in legitimate law enforcement
activities, unless with the consent of the person producing the same. This
subsection shall not be applicable to any criminal investigation or prosecution
brought under the laws of this or any state.
Sec. 90. 9 V.S.A. § 2522 is amended to read:
§ 2522. REGISTRATION
Every person who adopts and uses any trademark for the purpose of
designating, making known, and distinguishing any merchandise, goods,
wares, or other products of labor, manufactured, produced, compounded, sold,
or offered for sale in this State may, subject to the limitations hereafter set
forth in this chapter, file for record in the Office of the Secretary of State a
statement under oath or affirmation setting forth:
* * *
Sec. 91. 9 V.S.A. § 2575 is amended to read:
§ 2575. SEARCH WARRANT; JUDICIALPROCEEDINGS
If a person or corporation that has complied with the provisions of section
2571 of this title, or the agent of such person or corporation, makes oath or
affirmation before a judge of a Criminal Division of the Superior Court that he

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 62 of 69
or she the person, corporation, or agent has reason to believe and does believe
that a person has unlawfully in his or her that person’s possession or is
secreting a receptacle marked as provided in section 2571 of this title, the
judge, if satisfied that there is a reasonable cause for the belief, shall issue a
search warrant to discover and obtain the same, and may cause to be brought
before him or her the judge a person in whose possession such receptacle is
found, and shall inquire into the circumstances of the possession. If the judge
finds that the person is guilty of a willful violation of a provision of sections
2572–2574 of this title, he or she the judge shall impose the penalty prescribed
therein in the applicable section or sections, and award to the owner the
possession of the property taken upon the search warrant.
Sec. 92. 9 V.S.A. § 3044 is amended to read:
§ 3044. EXEMPTIONS
The following foods shall not be subject to the labeling requirements of
section 3043 of this title:
* * *
(2) A raw agricultural commodity or processed food derived from it that
has been grown, raised, or produced without the knowing or intentional use of
food or seed produced with genetic engineering. Food will be deemed to be as
described in this subdivision only if the person otherwise responsible for
complying with the requirements of subsection 3043(a) of this title with

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 63 of 69
respect to a raw agricultural commodity or processed food obtains, from
whomever sold the raw agricultural commodity or processed food to that
person, a sworn or affirmed statement that the raw agricultural commodity or
processed food has not been knowingly or intentionally produced with genetic
engineering and has been segregated from and has not been knowingly or
intentionally commingled with food that may have been produced with genetic
engineering at any time. In providing such a sworn or affirmed statement, any
person may rely on a sworn or affirmed statement from his or her the person’s
own supplier that contains the affirmation declaration set forth in this
subdivision.
* * *
Sec. 93. 9 V.S.A. § 3045(b) is amended to read:
(b) A retailer shall not be held liable for failure to label a raw agricultural
commodity as required by section 3043 of this title, provided that the retailer,
within 30 days of any proposed enforcement action or notice of violation,
obtains a sworn or affirmed statement in accordance with subdivision 3044(2)
of this title.
Sec. 94. 9 V.S.A. § 3346 is amended to read:
§ 3346. OATH OR AFFIRMATION, DUTIES, AND LIABILITIES OF
INSPECTOR

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 64 of 69
Before entering upon the duties of his or her the office, an inspector shall be
sworn or shall make an affirmation, and when called upon by a vendor,
purchaser, or by any officer mentioned in section 3348 of this title, to test such
oils, shall do so with reasonable dispatch by applying the fire test as indicated
and determined by Tagliabue’s pyrometer, or some instrument equally
accurate.
* * * Title 9A * * *
Sec. 95. 9A V.S.A. § 3—505(b) is amended to read:
(b) A protest is a certificate of dishonor made by a United States consul or
vice consul, or a notary public or other person authorized to administer oaths
or affirmations, or both, by the law of the place where dishonor occurs. It may
be made upon information satisfactory to that person. The protest must
identify the instrument and certify either that presentment has been made or, if
not made, the reason why it was not made, and that the instrument has been
dishonored by nonacceptance or nonpayment. The protest may also certify
that notice of dishonor has been given to some or all parties.
Sec. 96. 9A V.S.A. § 9—607(b) is amended to read:
(b) If necessary to enable a secured party to exercise subdivision (a)(3) of
this section, the right of a debtor to enforce a mortgage nonjudicially, the
secured party may record in the office in which a record of the mortgage is
recorded:

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 65 of 69
* * *
(2) the secured party’s sworn or affirmed affidavit in recordable form
stating that:
* * *
* * * Title 10 * * *
Sec. 97. 10 V.S.A. § 611(h) is amended to read:
(h) Before entering into his or her any duties, each commissioner of the
Agency shall take and subscribe an oath or affirmation to perform the duties of
his or her the office faithfully, impartially, and justly to the best of his or her
the individual’s ability. A record of the oath or affirmation shall be filed in the
Office of the Secretary of State.
Sec. 98. 10 V.S.A. § 2625(f) is amended to read:
(f) Appeals. If the exemption is denied or if authorization to proceed is
denied, the landowner shall have 30 days in which to file an appeal with the
Commissioner.
(1) Upon the filing of an appeal, the Commissioner may appoint a
review team of natural resources professionals to visit the site, gather
information about the proposed heavy cut, and make recommendations to the
Commissioner. The Commissioner may also appoint a hearing officer to take
sworn or affirmed statements of the landowner, the review team, and other

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 66 of 69
witnesses called by the landowner or the hearing officer, and make
recommendations to the Commissioner.
* * *
Sec. 99. 10 V.S.A. § 4191 is amended to read:
§ 4191. GAME WARDENS, NUMBER, RECORD
(a) The Commissioner, with the approval of the Governor, may employ a
chief game warden and as many State game wardens as may be required for
the proper enforcement of the fish and wildlife laws of the State. These
officers shall be included in the classified service created in 3 V.S.A. chapter
13. These officers and deputy game wardens employed as herein provided in
this subchapter shall be sworn or shall affirm to the faithful performance of
their duties. The Commissioner may appoint and employ for a limited time as
many deputy game wardens as deemed necessary. The number of game
wardens shall be determined by the Commissioner with the approval of the
Governor. A copy of the appointment and oath or affirmation of office of each
game warden and deputy shall be filed in the office of the Commissioner.
* * *
Sec. 100. 10 V.S.A. § 4270 is amended to read:
§ 4270. FUR BUYER’S RECORDS
Licensed dealers shall keep such records as the Commissioner may require.
Such These records shall be open to inspection by the Commissioner or his or

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 67 of 69
her the Commissioner’s agents, and such a dealer shall, within 30 days after
the expiration of his or her the dealer’s license and upon request of the
Commissioner, file with the Commissioner a sworn or affirmed statement of
such record or such part thereof any record or portion of a record as the
Commissioner may require.
Sec. 101. 10 V.S.A. § 4454(d) is amended to read:
(d)(1) Prior to suspending a Vermont hunting, fishing, or trapping license
of a resident of this State under subsection (a) of this section, the
Commissioner shall notify the person in writing. A suspension shall be
deemed effective:
* * *
(3) At the hearing, the Commissioner or a hearing officer designated by
the Commissioner may:
(A) administer oaths and affirmations;
* * *
Sec. 102. 10 V.S.A. § 4508 is amended to read:
§ 4508. SALE OF FORFEITED EQUIPMENT
Upon seizure of such firearm, jack, light, vehicle, or device without a
warrant, a game warden or other officer shall forthwith make complaint, under
oath or affirmation, subscribed by him or her a game warden or officer, to a
court or magistrate having jurisdiction of offenses hereunder under this title in

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 68 of 69
whose jurisdiction the same was item or items were seized. In the event, under
proceedings provided in sections 4503–4507 of this title, such that the device
is ordered forfeited and is a device not illegal in itself, such firearm, jack,
light, motor, or other vehicle or device, upon written order of such the court,
shall be sold by the Commissioner at public auction for the benefit of the State
by the Commissioner.
Sec. 103. 10 V.S.A. § 6027 is amended to read:
§ 6027. POWERS
(a) The Board and District Commissions shall have supervisory authority
in environmental matters respecting projects within their jurisdiction and shall
apply their independent judgment in determining facts and interpreting law.
Each shall have the power, with respect to any matter within its jurisdiction,
to:
(1) administer oaths and affirmations, take depositions, subpoena and
compel the attendance of witnesses, and require the production of evidence;
* * *
* * * Purpose; Interpretation * * *
Sec. 104. PURPOSE; INTERPRETATION
The purpose of this act is to expressly include the option of an affirmation
in each instance in which an oath or swearing is authorized or required
throughout Titles 1–10 of the Vermont Statutes Annotated (V.S.A.), except in

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.28
2025 Page 69 of 69
interstate compacts or as otherwise limited by law. The act also makes other
minor, technical amendments to the language of the affected statutes for
readability and consistency with V.S.A. style. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that the technical amendments in this act shall not supersede
substantive changes contained in other bills enacted by the General Assembly
during the current biennium. Where possible, the technical amendments in
this act shall be interpreted to be supplemental to other amendments to the
same sections of statute; to the extent the provisions conflict, the substantive
changes in other acts shall take precedence over the technical changes in this
act.
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 105. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
Sec. 105. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.